Utah statutes.
38-1-22.   Advance payments under terms of contract -- Effect on liens.

The subcontractors' liens provided for in this chapter shall extend to the full contract price, but if at the time of the commencement to do work or furnish materials the owner has paid upon the contract, in accordance with the terms thereof, any portion of the contract price, either in money or property, the lien of the contractor shall extend only to such unpaid balance, and the lien of any subcontractor who has notice of such payment shall be limited to the unpaid balance of the contract price. No part of the contract price shall by the terms of any contract be made payable, nor shall the same or any part thereof be paid in advance of the commencement of the work, for the purpose of evading or defeating the provisions of this chapter.

